cs: Tvar banneru: Vlaječka (trojúhelníková); Obdélníkové; Štít/erb; Vlaštovčí ocas / rozeklaný tvar; Kapka; Vertikální peří; Jiné
ja: バナーのShapes: ペナント (三角形); 長方形; シールド/クレスト; スワローテール/二股; ティアドロップ; 垂直フェザー; その他
da: Bannerform: Vimpel (trekantet); Rektangulær; Skjold/våbenskjold; Svalehale / todelt; Dråbeformet; Lodret fjer; Andet
it: Shapes dello striscione: Gagliardetto (triangolare); Rettangolare; Scudo/Stemma; A coda di rondine / Forcuto; A goccia; A piuma verticale; Altro
tr: Banner şekli: Flama (üçgen); Dikdörtgen; Kalkan/arma; Kırlangıç kuyruğu / çatallı; Gözyaşı damlası; Dikey tüy; Diğer
es: Forma de la pancarta: Banderín (triangular); Rectangular; Escudo/blasón; Cola de golondrina / bifurcada; Gota; Pluma vertical; Otro
th: รูปทรงแบนเนอร์: ธงราว (สามเหลี่ยม); สี่เหลี่ยมผืนผ้า; ทรงโล่/ตราสัญลักษณ์; ทรงหางนกนางแอ่น/แฉก; ทรงหยดน้ำ; ทรงขนนกแนวตั้ง; อื่นๆ
en: Banner shape: Pennant (triangular); Rectangular; Shield/crest; Swallowtail / forked; Teardrop; Vertical feather; Other
pt-BR: Forma do banner: Bandeirola (triangular); Retangular; Escudo/brasão; Rabo de andorinha / bifurcada; Gota; Pena vertical; Outros
vi: Hình dạng biểu ngữ: Cờ đuôi nheo (hình tam giác); Hình chữ nhật; Hình khiên/huy hiệu; Hình đuôi én / chẻ đôi; Hình giọt nước; Hình lông chim thẳng đứng; Khác
bg-BG: Форма на банера: Флагче (триъгълно); Правоъгълен; Щит/герб; Лястовича опашка / раздвоен; Сълза; Вертикално перо; Друго
zh-CN: 横幅形状: 三角旗（三角形）; 长方形; 盾形/纹章形; 燕尾形 / 叉形; 泪滴形; 垂直羽毛形; 其他
hr-HR: Oblik zastavica: Zastavica (trokutasta); Pravokutno; Štit/grb; Lastavičji rep / rašljasto; Suza; Okomito pero; Ostalo
fr: Forme de la bannière: Fanion (triangulaire); Rectangulaire; Bouclier/écusson; Queue d’aronde/fourchue; Goutte d’eau; Plume verticale; Autre
hu: Bannerformák: Zászlócska (háromszögletű); Téglalap alakú; Pajzs/címer; Fecskefarkú / villás; Csepp alakú; Függőleges toll; Egyéb
ru: Форма баннера: Вымпел (треугольный); Прямоугольный; Щит / герб; Ласточкин хвост / раздвоенный; Каплевидный; Вертикальное перо; Другое
lt-LT: Banerio forma: Gairelė (trikampė); Stačiakampis; Skydas / herbas; Dvišakė / kregždės uodegos formos; Lašo formos; Vertikali plunksna; Kita
nb: Bannerform: Vimpel (trekantet); Rektangulær; Skjold/våpenskjold; Svalehale / splittflagg; Dråpe; Vertikalt fjærflagg; Annet
sl-SI: Oblika transparenta: Zastavica (trikotna); Pravokotna; Ščit/grb; Lastovičji rep/viličasta; V obliki solze; Vertikalno pero; Drugo
de: Bannerformen: Wimpel (dreieckig); Rechteckig; Schild/Wappen; Schwalbenschwanz / gegabelt; Tropfenform; Federform (vertikal); Sonstige
sk-SK: Tvar bannera: Vlajočka (trojuholníková); Obdĺžniková; Štít/erb; Lastovičí chvost/vidlicová; V tvare slzy; Vertikálna (pierko); Iný
nl: Banner vorm: Wimpel (driehoekig); Rechthoekig; Schild/wapen; Zwaluwstaart / gevorkt; Druppel; Verticale veervlag; Overig
pt-PT: Forma do banner: Galhardete (triangular); Retangular; Escudo/brasão; Rabo de andorinha/forcado; Gota; Pena vertical; Outro
pl: Kształt banera: Proporczyk (trójkątny); Prostokątny; Tarcza/herb; Jaskółczy ogon / rozwidlony; Łezka; Pionowe pióro; Inny
zh-TW: 橫幅形狀: 三角旗; 長方形; 盾牌/徽章; 燕尾形 / 叉形; 水滴形; 垂直直立旗; 其他
el: Σχήμα μπάνερ: Σημαιάκι (τριγωνικό); Ορθογώνιο; Ασπίδα / έμβλημα; Χελιδονοουρά / διχαλωτό; Δάκρυ; Κάθετο φτερό; Άλλο
sv: Banderollform: Vimpel (trekantig); Rektangulär; Sköld/vapen; Svalstjärt/tvåtungad; Droppformad; Vertikal fjäder; Övrigt
ro-RO: Forma bannerului: Fanion (triunghiular); Dreptunghiular; Scut/blazon; Coadă de rândunică / bifurcat; Lacrimă; Pană verticală; Altele
fi: Banderollin muoto: Viiri (kolmionmuotoinen); Suorakulmainen; Kilpi/vaakuna; Pääskynpyrstö / haarautuva; Pisara; Pystysuora sulka; Muu
ko: 배너 형태: 페넌트(삼각형); 직사각형; 방패/문장; 제비꼬리 / 갈래형; 물방울 무늬; 수직 깃털 무늬; 기타